New York, session 2025-2026, S1784.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph and paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 1307 of the real property actions and proceedings law, the open- 3 ing paragraph as added by chapter 507 of the laws of 2009 and paragraph 4 (c) as added by chapter 160 of the laws of 2022, are amended and two new 5 paragraphs (e) and (f) are added to read as follows: 6 Such plaintiff shall have the right to peaceably enter upon such prop- 7 erty, or to cause others to peaceably enter upon the property for the 8 limited purpose of inspections, repairs and maintenance as required by 9 this section, inspection for the presence of abandoned companion animals 10 in accordance with paragraph (e) or (f) of this subdivision, or as 11 otherwise ordered by court; provided, however, that if the property is 12 occupied by a tenant, at least seven days notice must be given to such 13 tenant, unless emergency repairs are required in which case reasonable 14 notice shall be provided to the tenant. 15 (c) Such plaintiff shall have the right to peaceably enter upon such 16 property, or to cause others to peaceably enter upon the property for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05452-05-6 S. 1784--A 2 1 the limited purpose of inspections, repairs and maintenance as required 2 by this section, inspection for the presence of abandoned companion 3 animals in accordance with paragraph (e) or (f) of this subdivision, or 4 as otherwise ordered by court; provided, however, that if the property 5 is occupied by a tenant, at least seven days notice must be given to 6 such tenant, unless emergency repairs are required in which case reason- 7 able notice shall be provided to the tenant. 8 (e) If the plaintiff encounters a companion animal which appears to be 9 abandoned during an inspection performed under this subdivision, the 10 plaintiff shall immediately notify the dog control officer, the police, 11 or agent or officer of a duly incorporated humane society or duly incor- 12 porated society for the prevention of cruelty to animals about such 13 encounter, for the purpose of promptly retrieving or providing necessary 14 care for such companion animal at the property until the animal can be 15 retrieved. Any plaintiff who encounters an abandoned companion animal 16 pursuant to this paragraph shall not be deemed the owner, possessor or 17 person having charge or custody of the animal. 18 (f) Any plaintiff that fails to inspect a vacated or abandoned proper- 19 ty for abandoned companion animals in accordance with paragraph (e) of 20 this subdivision shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than 21 five hundred dollars for a first offense and not more than one thousand 22 dollars for a second offense and each subsequent offense thereafter. 23 Funds collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into the 24 animal population control fund established pursuant to section ninety- 25 seven-xx of the state finance law. The attorney general shall have 26 authority to enforce the penalties in this paragraph. 27 § 2. Section 1971 of the real property actions and proceedings law is 28 amended by adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 29 3. When the department finds that a dwelling is abandoned within the 30 meaning of this article, the department shall inspect the dwelling for 31 the presence of abandoned companion animals. If the department encount- 32 ers a companion animal which appears to be abandoned during such 33 inspection, the department shall immediately notify the dog control 34 officer, the police, or agent or officer of a duly incorporated humane 35 society or duly incorporated society for the prevention of cruelty to 36 animals about such encounter, for the purpose of promptly retrieving or 37 providing necessary care for such companion animal at the property 38 until the animal can be retrieved. The department or any department 39 employee who encounters an abandoned companion animal pursuant to this 40 subdivision shall not be deemed the owner, possessor or person having 41 charge or custody of the animal. 42 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.